Colorado, session 2026A, HB1156.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. Appropriation to the department of higher
education for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025. In Session Laws of
Colorado 2025, section 2 of chapter 476, (SB 25-206), amend Part VII as
follows:
Section 2. Appropriation.
________
Capital letters or bold & italic numbers indicate new material added to existing law; dashes
through words or numbers indicate deletions from existing law and such material is not part of
the act.

APPROPRIATION FROM
ITEM & TOTAL GENERAL GENERAL CASH REAPPROPRIATED FEDERAL
SUBTOTAL FUND FUND FUNDS FUNDS FUNDS
EXEMPT
$ $ $ $ $ $ $
PART VII
DEPARTMENT OF HIGHER EDUCATION
(1) DEPARTMENT ADMINISTRATIVE OFFICE
Health, Life, and Dental 3,451,453 1,107,054 1,820,283a 524,116(I)
3,466,689 1,052,516 1,882,448a 531,725(I)
Short-term Disability 14,281 4,712 7,563a 2,006(I)
Paid Family and Medical
Leave Insurance 91,802 30,288 48,621a 12,893(I)
Unfunded Liability
Amortization Equalization
Disbursement Payments 2,040,033 673,063 1,080,452a 286,518(I)
Salary Survey 569,961 194,789 296,328a 78,844(I)
Step Pay 131,676 43,932 68,503a 19,241(I)
PERA Direct Distribution 543,716 215,554 238,450a 89,712(I)
Shift Differential 6,497 6,497a
Workers' Compensation 83,134 61,665a 21,469b
Operating Expenses 40,910 40,910a
Legal Services 195,994 52,730 140,338a 2,926b
Payment to Risk
Management and Property
Funds 1,446,932 1,427,821a 19,111b
Leased Space 452,188 20,014 120,207a 311,967b
Payments to OIT 1,008,425 386,051 509,071a 110,931b 2,372(I)
983,905 484,551a
CORE Operations 44,611 16,633a 27,978b
10,121,613
10,112,329
PAGE 2-HOUSE BILL 26-1156

APPROPRIATION FROM
ITEM & TOTAL GENERAL GENERAL CASH REAPPROPRIATED FEDERAL
SUBTOTAL FUND FUND FUNDS FUNDS FUNDS
EXEMPT
$ $ $ $ $ $ $
a Of these amounts, $3,424,047 $3,449,753 shall be from the State Historical Fund created in Section 9 (5)(b)(II) of Article XVIII of the State Constitution and $2,460,333 $2,471,234
shall be from various sources of cash funds. Of the amount from the State Historical Fund, $2,923,431 $2,940,950 is estimated to be from the Museum and Preservation Operations
Account created in Section 44-30-1201 (5)(c)(I)(B), C.R.S., and $500,616 $508,803 is estimated to be from the Preservation Grant Program Account created in Section 44-30-1201
(5)(c)(I)(A), C.R.S. Of the amount from various sources of cash funds, $853,006 $866,031 is estimated to be from the Enterprise Services Fund created in Section 24-80-209 (2), C.R.S.,
$185,016 $183,790 is estimated to be from the Private Occupational Schools Fund created in Section 23-64-122 (1), C.R.S., $113,487 is estimated to be from the Community Museums
Cash Fund created in Section 24-80-209 (3), C.R.S., and $1,307,786 $1,307,926 is from various cash funds.
b These amounts shall be from statewide indirect cost recoveries.
(2) COLORADO COMMISSION ON HIGHER EDUCATION AND
HIGHER EDUCATION SPECIAL PURPOSE PROGRAMS
(A) Administration
Administration 6,546,627 5,805,089 417,087a 111,646b 212,805(I)
6,361,591 5,620,053
(37.7 FTE) (0.4 FTE) (3.1 FTE)
(38.4 FTE)
a This amount shall be from private college and university fees paid pursuant to Section 23-1-125 (5), C.R.S., and Section 23-2-104.5, C.R.S.
b Of this amount, $105,180 shall be transferred from the Department of Education from the Preschool to Postsecondary Education Alignment line item in the Student Learning section
for assistance in aligning public education with postsecondary and workforce readiness standards, and $6,466 shall be from statewide indirect cost recoveries.
(B) Division of Private
Occupational Schools 1,144,025 1,144,025a
(10.3 FTE)
a This amount shall be from the Private Occupational Schools Fund created in Section 23-64-122 (1), C.R.S.
(C) Special Purpose
Western Interstate
Commission for Higher
Education (WICHE) 169,000 169,000a
PAGE 3-HOUSE BILL 26-1156

APPROPRIATION FROM
ITEM & TOTAL GENERAL GENERAL CASH REAPPROPRIATED FEDERAL
SUBTOTAL FUND FUND FUNDS FUNDS FUNDS
EXEMPT
$ $ $ $ $ $ $
WICHE - Optometry 385,500 385,500a
Distribution to Higher
Education Competitive
Research Authority 2,800,000 2,800,000b
Veterinary School Capital
Outlay 285,000 143,640(I)c 141,360a
Colorado Geological Survey
at the Colorado School of
Mines 2,623,287 725,225 1,898,062d
(15.5 FTE)
Institute of Cannabis
Research Hosted at
CSU-Pueblo26 3,075,000 3,075,000e
GEAR UP 5,000,000 5,000,000(I)
(29.1 FTE)
Rural Teacher Recruitment,
Retention, and Professional
Development 1,209,357 1,209,357
(0.8 FTE)
Open Educational Resources
Initiatives 1,108,200 1,108,200
(1.0 FTE)
Financial Aid Assessment
Tool 154,069 154,069a
(0.5 FTE)
Growing Great Teachers -
Teacher Mentor Grants 648,477 648,477
(0.5 FTE)
PAGE 4-HOUSE BILL 26-1156

APPROPRIATION FROM
ITEM & TOTAL GENERAL GENERAL CASH REAPPROPRIATED FEDERAL
SUBTOTAL FUND FUND FUNDS FUNDS FUNDS
EXEMPT
$ $ $ $ $ $ $
Center for Substance Use
Disorder, Prevention,
Treatment, and Recovery
Support Strategies at the
University of Colorado
Health Sciences Center 4,250,000 4,250,000e
Online Platform for Public
Benefits for Higher
Education Students 45,000 45,000
Inclusive Higher Education
Grant Program 450,000 450,000
S.B. 22-192 Development
and Implementation of
Stackable Credentials 200,535 138,685 61,850f
(1.5 FTE)
S.B. 22-226 CARE FORWARD
PROGRAM 1,026,396 1,026,396g
22,403,425
23,429,821
a Of these amounts, $749,325 shall be from statewide indirect cost recoveries and $100,604 shall be from departmental indirect cost recoveries.
b This amount shall be from the Innovative Higher Education Research Fund created in Section 23-19.7-104 (1), C.R.S., from limited gaming revenue deposited to the Fund pursuant
to Section 44-30-701 (2)(a)(IV), C.R.S., in prior years.
c This amount shall be from student fees from non-resident students, including fees paid on behalf of non-resident students by the Western Interstate Commission on Higher Education,
pursuant to Section 23-31-118 (2), C.R.S. This amount is shown for informational purposes only because the student fees are paid directly to the Veterinary School at Colorado State
University.
d This amount shall be from the Severance Tax Operational Fund created in Section 39-29-109 (2)(b), C.R.S., pursuant to Section 39-29-109.3 (1)(b), C.R.S.
e These amounts shall be from the Marijuana Tax Cash Fund created in Section 39-28.8-501 (1), C.R.S.
f This amount shall be from the Credentials to Support Colorado Jobs Cash Fund created in Section 23-5-145.6 (5)(a), C.R.S.
g THIS AMOUNT SHALL BE FROM THE ECONOMIC RECOVERY AND RELIEF CASH FUND CREATED IN SECTION 24-75-228 (2)(a), C.R.S., ORIGINATING FROM GENERAL FUND.
PAGE 5-HOUSE BILL 26-1156

APPROPRIATION FROM
ITEM & TOTAL GENERAL GENERAL CASH REAPPROPRIATED FEDERAL
SUBTOTAL FUND FUND FUNDS FUNDS FUNDS
EXEMPT
$ $ $ $ $ $ $
(D) Lease Purchase Payments and
Capital-related Outlays
University of Colorado,
Lease Purchase of Academic
Facilities at Fitzsimons 2,084,712 2,084,712a
Appropriation to the Higher
Education Federal Mineral
Lease Revenues Fund 16,866,824 16,866,824
17,331,645 17,331,645
Lease Purchase of Academic
Facilities Pursuant to Section
23-19.9-102, C.R.S. 17,437,100 570,276b 16,866,824c
17,509,709 178,064b 17,331,645c
Annual Depreciation-Lease
Equivalent Payment 13,100,234 13,100,234
Senate Bill 20-219 COP
Payments 4,756,000 4,756,000
Lease Purchase Payment for
Colorado State University
National Western Center 17,501,006 17,501,006d
71,745,876
72,283,306
a This amount shall be from the University of Colorado Health Sciences Center at Fitzsimons Trust Fund created in Section 23-20-136 (3)(a), C.R.S.
b This amount shall be from the Higher Education Federal Mineral Lease Revenues Fund created in Section 23-19.9-102 (1)(a), C.R.S.
c This amount shall be from the Higher Education Federal Mineral Lease Revenues Fund created in Section 23-19.9-102 (1)(a), C.R.S. The reappropriated funds are from General Fund
amounts included in the Appropriation to the Higher Education Federal Mineral Lease Revenues Fund line item in this subdivision.
d This amount shall be from the National Western Center Trust Fund created in Section 23-31-902 (2), C.R.S., and originates as General Fund pursuant to Section 23-31-902 (3), C.R.S.
(E) Tuition/Enrollment
Contingency27 75,000,000 75,000,000a
PAGE 6-HOUSE BILL 26-1156

APPROPRIATION FROM
ITEM & TOTAL GENERAL GENERAL CASH REAPPROPRIATED FEDERAL
SUBTOTAL FUND FUND FUNDS FUNDS FUNDS
EXEMPT
$ $ $ $ $ $ $
a This amount shall be from tuition revenue from the governing boards, in addition to what is appropriated to the governing boards. This spending authority may be transferred to the
governing boards.
(F) Indirect Cost
Assessments 5,773,912 312,886a 4,948,581b 512,445(I)
a Of this amount, $145,690 shall be from the Museum and Preservation Operations Account of the State Historical Fund, created in Section 44-30-1201 (5)(c)(I)(B), C.R.S., $89,587
shall be from statewide indirect cost recoveries from CollegeInvest and CollegeAssist, and $77,609 shall be from the Private Occupational Schools Fund created in Section 23-64-122
(1), C.R.S.
b This amount shall be from statewide indirect cost recoveries from amounts appropriated to the state governing boards in this department.
182,613,865
183,992,655
(3) COLORADO COMMISSION ON HIGHER EDUCATION FINANCIAL AID
(A) Need Based Grants 259,883,994 78,638,127 179,968,585a 1,277,282b
a This amount shall be from the General Fund Exempt Account created in Section 24-77-103.6 (2), C.R.S.
b This amount shall be from statewide indirect cost recoveries.
(B) Work Study28 23,129,178 23,129,178
(C) Special Purpose
Veterans'/Law Enforcement/
POW Tuition Assistance 1,643,700 1,643,700
Native American
Students/Fort Lewis College 21,307,918 21,307,918
Colorado Opportunity
Scholarship Initiative Fund 10,000,000 10,000,000
PAGE 7-HOUSE BILL 26-1156

APPROPRIATION FROM
ITEM & TOTAL GENERAL GENERAL CASH REAPPROPRIATED FEDERAL
SUBTOTAL FUND FUND FUNDS FUNDS FUNDS
EXEMPT
$ $ $ $ $ $ $
Tuition Assistance for Career
and Technical Education
Certificate Programs 450,000 450,000
Fourth-year Innovation Pilot
Program 555,573 555,573
290,958 290,958
(1.0 FTE)
(0.3 FTE)
State Aid for Foster Students
Program 2,962,463 2,962,463
4,059,272 4,059,272
(4.0 FTE)
Postsecondary Assistance for
Students who were Homeless
in High School 1,655,041 1,655,041
(2.0 FTE)
38,574,695
39,406,889
321,587,867
322,420,061
(4) COLLEGE OPPORTUNITY FUND PROGRAM
(A) Stipends
Stipends for an estimated
115,406 eligible full-time
equivalent students at $3,480
per 30 credit hours 401,613,924
PAGE 8-HOUSE BILL 26-1156

APPROPRIATION FROM
ITEM & TOTAL GENERAL GENERAL CASH REAPPROPRIATED FEDERAL
SUBTOTAL FUND FUND FUNDS FUNDS FUNDS
EXEMPT
$ $ $ $ $ $ $
Stipends for an estimated
1,505 eligible full-time
equivalent students attending
participating private
institutions at $1,740 per 30
credit hours 2,618,369
404,232,293 47,396,881 356,835,412a
a This amount shall be from the General Fund Exempt Account created in Section 24-77-103.6 (2), C.R.S.
(B) Fee-for-service Contracts with State
Institutions
Fee-for-service Contracts
with State Institutions
Pursuant to Section
23-18-303.5, C.R.S. 632,467,631
624,897,884
Fee-for-service Contracts
with State Institutions for
Specialty Education
Programs25 214,002,755
212,452,274
Limited Purpose
Fee-for-Service Contracts
with State Institutions 6,440,376
3,426,476
852,910,762 156,848,950 696,061,812a
840,776,634 144,714,822
1,257,143,055
1,245,008,927
PAGE 9-HOUSE BILL 26-1156

APPROPRIATION FROM
ITEM & TOTAL GENERAL GENERAL CASH REAPPROPRIATED FEDERAL
SUBTOTAL FUND FUND FUNDS FUNDS FUNDS
EXEMPT
$ $ $ $ $ $ $
a This amount shall be from the General Fund Exempt Account created in Section 24-77-103.6 (2), C.R.S.
(5) GOVERNING BOARDS29
(A) Trustees of Adams
State University29 57,763,652 29,133,835a 28,629,817b
57,522,050 28,388,215b
(418.0 FTE)
a Of this amount, $25,204,933 shall be from the students' share of tuition, $3,907,170(I) shall be from mandatory fees, and $21,732(I) represents an estimate of limited gaming tax revenues
that will be distributed pursuant to Section 44-30-702 (3)(c)(I), C.R.S.
b This amount shall be from General Fund appropriated to the College Opportunity Fund Program in this department, including $2,655,240 for student stipend payments, $25,909,577
$25,700,475 for fee-for-service contracts pursuant to Section 23-18-303.5, C.R.S., and $65,000 $32,500 for limited purpose fee-for-service contracts.
(B) Trustees of Colorado
Mesa University29 149,019,275 98,797,167a 50,222,108b
148,545,710 49,748,543b
(936.8 FTE)
a Of this amount, $89,579,790 shall be from the students' share of tuition, $7,417,281(I), shall be from mandatory fees, and $1,800,096(I) represents an estimate of limited gaming tax
revenues that will be distributed pursuant to Section 44-30-702 (3)(c)(I), C.R.S.
b This amount shall be from General Fund appropriated to the College Opportunity Fund Program in this department, including $20,742,192 for student stipend payments, $29,264,916
$28,898,851 for fee-for-service contracts pursuant to Section 23-18-303.5, C.R.S., and $215,000 $107,500 for limited purpose fee-for-service contracts.
(C) Trustees of
Metropolitan State
University of Denver29 254,187,312 148,320,036a 105,867,276b
253,306,410 104,986,374b
(1,431.8 FTE)
PAGE 10-HOUSE BILL 26-1156

APPROPRIATION FROM
ITEM & TOTAL GENERAL GENERAL CASH REAPPROPRIATED FEDERAL
SUBTOTAL FUND FUND FUNDS FUNDS FUNDS
EXEMPT
$ $ $ $ $ $ $
a Of this amount, $111,115,755 shall be from the students' share of tuition and $37,204,281(I) shall be from mandatory fees.
b This amount shall be from General Fund appropriated to the College Opportunity Fund Program in this department, including $36,479,448 for student stipend payments, $69,172,828
$68,399,426 for fee-for-service contracts pursuant to Section 23-18-303.5, C.R.S., and $215,000 $107,500 for limited purpose fee-for-service contracts.
(D) Trustees of Western
Colorado University29 53,641,184 28,297,579a 25,343,605b
53,374,370 25,076,791b
(359.3 FTE)
a Of this amount, $22,853,626 shall be from the student's share of tuition and $5,443,953(I) shall be from mandatory fees.
b This amount shall be from General Fund appropriated to the College Opportunity Fund Program in this department, including $5,050,872 for student stipend payments, $20,127,733
$19,943,419 for fee-for-service contracts pursuant to Section 23-18-303.5, C.R.S., and $165,000 $82,500 for limited purpose fee-for-service contracts.
(E) Board of Governors of
the Colorado State
University System29 919,090,483 66,983 668,038,778a 250,984,722b
916,888,363 248,782,602b
(5,222.6 FTE)
a Of this amount, $578,917,328 shall be from the students' share of tuition, $88,221,450(I) shall be from mandatory fees, and $900,000 shall be from the Marijuana Tax Cash Fund created
in Section 39-28.8-501 (1), C.R.S.
b This amount shall be from General Fund appropriated to the College Opportunity Fund Program in this department, including $54,989,916 for student stipend payments, $95,047,506
$94,033,489 for fee-for-service contracts pursuant to Section 23-18-303.5, C.R.S., $100,206,766 $99,388,930 for fee-for-service contracts for specialty education programs, and $740,534
$370,267 for limited purpose fee-for-service contracts.
(F) Trustees of Fort Lewis
College29 78,012,488 54,177,066a 23,835,422b
77,805,982 23,628,916b
(460.6 FTE)
PAGE 11-HOUSE BILL 26-1156

APPROPRIATION FROM
ITEM & TOTAL GENERAL GENERAL CASH REAPPROPRIATED FEDERAL
SUBTOTAL FUND FUND FUNDS FUNDS FUNDS
EXEMPT
$ $ $ $ $ $ $
a Of this amount, $47,706,975 shall be from the students' share of tuition and $6,470,091(I) shall be from mandatory fees.
b This amount shall be from General Fund appropriated to the College Opportunity Fund Program in this department, including $4,075,776 for student stipend payments, $19,694,646
$19,520,640 for fee-for-service contracts pursuant to Section 23-18-303.5, C.R.S., and $65,000 $32,500 for limited purpose fee-for-service contracts.
(G) Regents of the
University of
Colorado25, 29, 30 1,866,178,268 1,505,527,348a 360,650,920b
1,861,576,936 356,049,588b
(10,305.6 FTE)
a Of this amount, $1,417,388,775 shall be from the students' share of tuition, $72,300,000(I) shall be from mandatory fees, $13,838,573 shall be from the Tobacco Litigation Settlement
Moneys Health Education Fund created in Section 24-75-1104.5 (1.7)(c), C.R.S., and $2,000,000 shall be from the Marijuana Tax Cash Fund created in Section 39-28.8-501 (1), C.R.S.
b This amount shall be from General Fund appropriated to the College Opportunity Fund Program in this department, including $98,554,992 for student stipend payments, $143,782,858
$142,008,882 for fee-for-service contracts pursuant to Section 23-18-303.5, C.R.S., $113,880,907 $113,063,344 for fee-for-service contracts for specialty education programs, and
$4,432,163 $2,422,370 for limited purpose fee-for-service contracts.
(H) Trustees of the
Colorado School of Mines29 293,449,316 255,308,692a 38,140,624b
293,170,116 37,861,424b
(1,229.4 FTE)
a Of this amount, $228,524,019 shall be from the students' share of tuition and $26,784,673(I) shall be from mandatory fees.
b This amount shall be from General Fund appropriated to the College Opportunity Fund Program in this department, including $10,598,340 for student stipend payments and $27,542,284
$27,263,084 for fee-for-service contracts pursuant to Section 23-18-303.5, C.R.S.
(I) University of Northern
Colorado29 162,592,717 92,038,400a 70,554,317b
162,044,217 70,005,817b
(1,203.8 FTE)
PAGE 12-HOUSE BILL 26-1156

APPROPRIATION FROM
ITEM & TOTAL GENERAL GENERAL CASH REAPPROPRIATED FEDERAL
SUBTOTAL FUND FUND FUNDS FUNDS FUNDS
EXEMPT
$ $ $ $ $ $ $
a Of this amount, $75,053,590 shall be from the students' share of tuition and $16,984,810(I) shall be from mandatory fees.
b This amount shall be from General Fund appropriated to the College Opportunity Fund Program in this department, including $15,081,276 for student stipend payments, $55,408,041
$54,892,041 for fee-for-service contracts pursuant to Section 23-18-303.5, C.R.S., and $65,000 $32,500 for limited purpose fee-for-service contracts.
(J) State Board for
Community Colleges and
Occupational Education
State System Community
Colleges29 696,584,638 396,288,763a 300,295,875b
694,151,051 297,862,288b
(5,942.8 FTE)
a Of this amount, $346,363,087 shall be from the students' share of tuition, $30,127,165(I) represents an estimate of limited gaming tax revenues that will be distributed pursuant to Section
44-30-702 (3)(c)(I), C.R.S., and $19,798,511(I) shall be from mandatory fees.
b This amount shall be from General Fund appropriated to the College Opportunity Fund Program in this department, including $153,385,872 for student stipend payments, $146,432,324
$144,237,577 for fee-for-service contracts pursuant to Section 23-18-303.5, C.R.S., and $477,679 $238,839 for limited purpose fee-for-service contracts.
4,530,519,333
4,518,385,205
(6) LOCAL DISTRICT COLLEGE GRANTS PURSUANT TO
SECTION 23-71-301, C.R.S.
Colorado Mountain College 15,173,668 13,427,901 1,745,767(I)a
15,075,848 13,330,081
Aims Community College 18,391,564 15,867,083 2,524,481(I)a
18,275,413 15,750,932
33,565,232
33,351,261
PAGE 13-HOUSE BILL 26-1156

APPROPRIATION FROM
ITEM & TOTAL GENERAL GENERAL CASH REAPPROPRIATED FEDERAL
SUBTOTAL FUND FUND FUNDS FUNDS FUNDS
EXEMPT
$ $ $ $ $ $ $
a These amounts represent estimates of limited gaming tax revenues that will be distributed pursuant to Section 44-30-702 (3)(c)(I), C.R.S.
(7) DIVISION OF OCCUPATIONAL EDUCATION
(A) Administrative Costs 1,062,309 1,062,309a
(9.0 FTE)
a This amount shall be from statewide indirect cost recoveries.
(B) Distribution of State
Assistance for Career and
Technical Education
pursuant to Section
23-8-102. C.R.S. 32,689,057 32,689,057a
a This amount shall be transferred from the Department of Education from the Transfer to the Department of Higher Education for Distribution of State Assistance for Career and Technical
Education line item appropriation in the Assistance to Public Schools section.
(C) Area Technical
Colleges 22,911,338 22,911,338
22,743,621 22,743,621
(D) Sponsored Programs
(1) Administration 2,709,888
(23.0 FTE)
(2) Programs 16,156,031
18,865,919 18,865,919(I)
(E) Colorado First
Customized Job Training 4,500,000 4,500,000a
PAGE 14-HOUSE BILL 26-1156

APPROPRIATION FROM
ITEM & TOTAL GENERAL GENERAL CASH REAPPROPRIATED FEDERAL
SUBTOTAL FUND FUND FUNDS FUNDS FUNDS
EXEMPT
$ $ $ $ $ $ $
a This amount shall be transferred from the Governor - Lieutenant Governor - State Planning and Budgeting from the Colorado First Customized Job Training line item
appropriation in the Economic Development Programs section.
80,028,623
79,860,906
(8) AURARIA HIGHER EDUCATION CENTER
Administration 31,435,042 31,435,042a
(231.7 FTE)
a This amount shall be from the appropriations to the Governing Boards in the Department of Higher Education for the State Board of Community Colleges and Occupational Education,
the Trustees of Metropolitan State College, and the Regents of the University of Colorado.
(9) HISTORY COLORADO
(A) Central Administration31
Central Administration 2,711,913 2,595,571a 116,342(I)
(15.0 FTE)
Collections and Curatorial
Services 1,548,016 1,548,016a
(16.5 FTE)
Facilities Management 1,928,521 1,928,521a
(10.0 FTE)
Capitol Complex Leased
Space 968,045 968,045
Historical Site Maintenance
and Operations 860,028 114,073 745,955a
(6.0 FTE)
America 250 - Colorado 150
Commission 168,653 168,653
(1.0 FTE)
PAGE 15-HOUSE BILL 26-1156

APPROPRIATION FROM
ITEM & TOTAL GENERAL GENERAL CASH REAPPROPRIATED FEDERAL
SUBTOTAL FUND FUND FUNDS FUNDS FUNDS
EXEMPT
$ $ $ $ $ $ $
Lease Purchase of Colorado
History Museum 3,567,417 3,525,209 42,208a
11,752,593
a Of these amounts, $6,375,271 shall be from the Museum and Preservation Operations Account of the State Historical Fund, created in Section 44-30-1201 (5)(c)(I)(B), C.R.S., $300,000
shall be from the Community Museums Cash Fund created in Section 24-80-209 (3), C.R.S., and $185,000 shall be from the Enterprise Services Cash Fund created in Section 24-80-209
(2), C.R.S. Amounts in the Museum and Preservation Operations Account are from limited gaming revenues deposited in the State Historical Fund pursuant to Section 9 (5)(b)(II) of
Article XVIII of the State Constitution and allocated pursuant to Section 44-30-1201 (5)(c), C.R.S.
(B) History Colorado Museums31
History Colorado Center 1,294,662 891,673a 325,000b 77,989(I)
(7.0 FTE)
Community Museums 3,366,810 1,357,768 2,006,039c 3,003(I)
(19.0 FTE)
Statewide Programming 4,752,802 4,752,802d
(34.5 FTE)
9,414,274
a Of this amount, $757,829 shall be from the Enterprise Services Fund created in Section 24-80-209 (2), C.R.S., and $133,844 shall be from the Museum and Preservation Operations
Account of the State Historical Fund, created in Section 44-30-1201 (5)(c)(I)(B), C.R.S. Amounts in the Museum and Preservation Operations Account are from limited gaming revenues
deposited in the State Historical Fund pursuant to Section 9 (5)(b)(II) of Article XVIII of the State Constitution and allocated pursuant to Section 44-30-1201 (5)(c), C.R.S.
b This amount shall be from indirect cost recoveries from the State Historical Fund program.
c Of this amount, $1,027,612 shall be from the Museum and Preservation Operations Account of the State Historical Fund, created in Section 44-30-1201 (5)(c)(I)(B), C.R.S., and
$978,427 shall be from the Community Museums Cash Fund created in Section 24-80-209 (3), C.R.S. Amounts in the Museum and Preservation Operations Account are from limited
gaming revenues deposited in the State Historical Fund pursuant to Section 9 (5)(b)(II) of Article XVIII of the State Constitution and allocated pursuant to Section 44-30-1201 (5)(c),
C.R.S.
d Of this amount, $2,678,895 shall be from the Enterprise Services Fund created in Section 24-80-209 (2), C.R.S., and $2,073,907 shall be from the Museum and Preservation Operations
Account of the State Historical Fund, created in Section 44-30-1201 (5)(c)(I)(B), C.R.S. Amounts in the Museum and Preservation Operations Account are from limited gaming revenues
deposited in the State Historical Fund pursuant to Section 9 (5)(b)(II) of Article XVIII of the State Constitution and allocated pursuant to Section 44-30-1201 (5)(c), C.R.S.
PAGE 16-HOUSE BILL 26-1156

APPROPRIATION FROM
ITEM & TOTAL GENERAL GENERAL CASH REAPPROPRIATED FEDERAL
SUBTOTAL FUND FUND FUNDS FUNDS FUNDS
EXEMPT
$ $ $ $ $ $ $
(C) Office of Archeology
and Historic Preservation31
Program Costs 2,090,386 61,531 940,479a 147,283b 941,093(I)
(23.5 FTE)
Native American boarding
School Research Program 333,333 333,333
(2.0 FTE)
2,423,719
a Of this amount, $880,479 shall be from the Museum and Preservation Operations Account of the State Historical Fund, created in Section 44-30-1201 (5)(c)(I)(B), C.R.S., and $60,000
shall be from the Enterprise Services Cash Fund created in Section 24-80-209 (2), C.R.S. Amounts in the Museum and Preservation Operations Account are from limited gaming revenues
deposited in the State Historical Fund pursuant to Section 9 (5)(b)(II) of Article XVIII of the State Constitution and allocated pursuant to Section 44-30-1201 (5)(c), C.R.S.
b This amount shall be transferred from the Governor - Lieutenant Governor - State Planning and Budgeting from the Economic Development Programs section from revenues
associated with the Historic Tax Credit program.
(D) State Historical Fund Program
Administration 2,061,430 2,061,430a
(20.0 FTE)
Statewide Preservation
Grants 9,000,000 9,000,000(I)a
Gaming Cities Distributions 6,489,914 6,489,914(I)b
Indirect Cost Assessment for
History Colorado
Administration 325,000 325,000a
17,876,344
PAGE 17-HOUSE BILL 26-1156

APPROPRIATION FROM
ITEM & TOTAL GENERAL GENERAL CASH REAPPROPRIATED FEDERAL
SUBTOTAL FUND FUND FUNDS FUNDS FUNDS
EXEMPT
$ $ $ $ $ $ $
a These amounts shall be from the Preservation Grant Program Account of the State Historical Fund, created in Section 44-30-1201 (5)(c)(I)(A), C.R.S. Amounts in this account are from
limited gaming revenues deposited in the State Historical Fund pursuant to Section 9 (5)(b)(II) of Article XVIII of the State Constitution and allocated pursuant to Section 44-30-1201
(5)(c), C.R.S. Pursuant to Section 44-30-1201 (5)(c)(I)(A), C.R.S., money in the Preservation Grant Program Account is subject to annual appropriation for the selection, monitoring,
and administration of grants. Any money not appropriated for these administrative purposes is continuously appropriated for preservation grants which are reflected for informational
purposes.
b This amount shall be from Limited Gaming Revenues deposited in the State Historical Fund created in Section 9 (5)(b)(II) of Article XVIII of the State Constitution and reflects an
estimate of the 20 percent share of State Historical Fund revenues to be used for the preservation and restoration of the cities of Central, Black Hawk, and Cripple Creek pursuant to
Section 9 (5)(b)(III) of Article XVIII of the State Constitution.
(E) Cumbres and Toltec
Railroad Commission32 3,535,000 1,365,000 2,170,000(I)a
a Of this amount, $2,150,000 shall be from the State of New Mexico and $20,000 shall be from Cumbres and Toltec Scenic Railroad Commission cash funds. Amounts from the
State of New Mexico are shown for informational purposes only.
45,001,930
TOTALS PART VII
(HIGHER EDUCATION) $6,492,016,560 $452,336,026 $1,232,865,809a $3,430,837,406b $1,349,232,021 $26,745,298c
$6,469,568,316 $440,877,651 $3,431,509,235b $1,337,562,714 $26,752,907c
a This amount shall be from the General Fund Exempt Account created in Section 24-77-103.6 (2), C.R.S.
b Of this amount, $329,555,015 contains an (I) notation.
c This amount contains an (I) notation.
FOOTNOTES -- The following statements are referenced to the numbered footnotes throughout section 2.
25 Department of Health Care Policy and Financing, Totals; Department of Higher Education, College Opportunity Fund Program, Fee-for-service Contracts
with State Institutions, Fee-for-service Contracts with State Institutions for Specialty Education Programs; Governing Boards, Regents of the University of
Colorado -- The Department of Higher Education shall transfer $900,000 to the Department of Health Care Policy and Financing for administrative costs and
PAGE 18-HOUSE BILL 26-1156

APPROPRIATION FROM
ITEM & TOTAL GENERAL GENERAL CASH REAPPROPRIATED FEDERAL
SUBTOTAL FUND FUND FUNDS FUNDS FUNDS
EXEMPT
$ $ $ $ $ $ $
family medicine residency placements associated with care provided by the faculty of the health sciences center campus at the University of Colorado that
are eligible for payment pursuant to Section 25.5-4-401, C.R.S. If the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid services continues to allow the Department
of Health Care Policy and Financing to make supplemental payments to the University of Colorado School of Medicine, the Department of Higher Education
shall transfer the amount approved, up to $112,280,907, to the Department of Health Care Policy and Financing pursuant to Section 23-18-304(1)(c), C.R.S.
If permission is discontinued, or is granted for a lesser amount, the Department of Higher Education shall transfer any portion of the $112,280,907 that is not
transferred to the Department of Health Care Policy and Financing to the Regents of the University of Colorado.
26 Department of Higher Education, Colorado Commission on Higher Education and Higher Education Special Purpose Programs, Special Purpose, Institute
of Cannabis Research Hosted at CSU - Pueblo -- Of the appropriation in this line item, $700,000 remains available until the close of the 2026-27 fiscal year.
27 Department of Higher Education, Colorado Commission on Higher Education and Higher Education Special Purpose Programs, Tuition/Enrollment
Contingency -- The Colorado Commission on Higher Education may transfer spending authority from this line item to the Governing Boards if tuition revenue
increases beyond appropriated levels. The spending authority for this line item is in addition to the funds appropriated directly to the Governing Boards. It
is the General Assembly's intent that the Colorado Commission on Higher Education transfer spending authority from this line item to allow institutions to
receive and expend tuition revenue beyond appropriated levels that results from higher than expected enrollment and not to support tuition increases that exceed
the assumptions outlined in the footnotes for each governing board.
28 Department of Higher Education, Colorado Commission on Higher Education Financial Aid, Work Study -- Two percent of the Work Study appropriation
remains available for expenditure until the close of the 2026-27 state fiscal year.
29 Department of Higher Education, Governing Boards; Trustees of Adams State University; Trustees of Colorado Mesa University; Trustees of Metropolitan
State University of Denver; Trustees of Western Colorado University; Board of Governors of the Colorado State University System; Trustees of Fort Lewis
College; Regents of the University of Colorado; Trustees of the Colorado School of Mines; University of Northern Colorado; State Board for Community
Colleges and Occupational Education State System Community Colleges -- The amounts in these line items are calculated based on the assumption that no
undergraduate student with in-state classification will pay more tuition in FY 2025-26 than three and five-tenths percent over what a student would have paid
in FY 2024-25 for the same credit hours and course of study, except that mandatory student fees up to a total of $794 for 30 credit hours at the University of
Colorado Boulder may be incorporated into resident tuition rates, with no resulting effective combined tuition and mandatory fee increase to any student, and
any incorporated fees shall never be reestablished as a student fee. These amounts are also calculated based on the assumption that each governing board will
increase tuition rates for graduate and nonresident students based on its assessment of market conditions, except that the calculation for any institution at which
the state contributes a share of nonresident tuition is based on the assumption that no student with nonresident classification will pay more tuition in FY
2025-26 than three and five-tenths percent over what a student would have paid in FY 2024-25 for the same credit hours and course of study. The General
Assembly intends to adjust the amounts in these line items through supplemental action during FY 2025-26 based on updated enrollment estimates and tuition
rate information.
PAGE 19-HOUSE BILL 26-1156

APPROPRIATION FROM
ITEM & TOTAL GENERAL GENERAL CASH REAPPROPRIATED FEDERAL
SUBTOTAL FUND FUND FUNDS FUNDS FUNDS
EXEMPT
$ $ $ $ $ $ $
30 Department of Higher Education, Governing Boards, Regents of the University of Colorado -- The appropriation in this line item includes $2,000,000 cash
funds from the Marijuana Tax Cash Fund to support scientific research on the impact of high potency THC, related policy analysis, and dissemination of a
public information campaign on the impact of high-THC marijuana concentrates. The General Assembly intends that this money be used to build on work
conducted by the School of Public Health pursuant to House Bill 21-1317, concerning the regulation of marijuana for safe consumption.
31 Department of Higher Education, History Colorado, Central Administration; History Colorado Museums; Office of Archaeology and Historic Preservation
-- In addition to the transfer authority provided in Section 24-75-108, C.R.S., History Colorado may transfer up to 10.0 percent of the total amount appropriated
in these sections between the sections and among the line items within the sections.
32 Department of Higher Education, History Colorado, Cumbres and Toltec Railroad Commission -- The amount in this line item is calculated based on the following
assumptions: (1) This line item includes $280,000 General Fund for annual Commission operating expenses and other routine ongoing costs including controlled
maintenance; (2) the balance of the General Fund appropriation, totaling $1,085,000, is for capital projects including locomotive boiler repair, passenger car upgrades,
and track, bridge, and tunnel upgrades.
PAGE 20-HOUSE BILL 26-1156

APPROPRIATION FROM
ITEM & TOTAL GENERAL GENERAL CASH REAPPROPRIATED FEDERAL
SUBTOTAL FUND FUND FUNDS FUNDS FUNDS
EXEMPT
$ $ $ $ $ $ $
SECTION 2. Appropriation to the department of higher education for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2024. In Session Laws of Colorado 2024, section 2 of chapter
519, (HB 24-1430), amend Part VII (2)(C) and the affected totals; and add footnote 31a, as Part VII (2)(C) and the affected totals are amended by Session Laws of Colorado 2025, section
1 of chapter 457, (SB 25-094), and as Part VII (2)(C) and the affected totals are further amended by section 10 of chapter 476, (SB 25-206), as follows:
Section 2. Appropriation.
PART VII
DEPARTMENT OF HIGHER EDUCATION
(2) COLORADO COMMISSION ON HIGHER EDUCATION AND
HIGHER EDUCATION SPECIAL PURPOSE PROGRAMS
(C) Special Purpose
Western Interstate
Commission for Higher
Education (WICHE) 169,000 169,000a
WICHE - Optometry 385,500 385,500a
Distribution to Higher
Education Competitive
Research Authority 2,800,000 2,800,000b
Veterinary School Capital
Outlay 285,000 143,640(I)c 141,360a
Colorado Geological Survey
at the Colorado School of
Mines 2,537,761 701,581 1,836,180d
(15.5 FTE)
Institute of Cannabis
Research Hosted at
CSU-Pueblo31 3,800,000 3,800,000e
GEAR UP 5,000,000 5,000,000(I)
(29.1 FTE)
Prosecution Fellowship
Program 356,496 356,496
PAGE 21-HOUSE BILL 26-1156

APPROPRIATION FROM
ITEM & TOTAL GENERAL GENERAL CASH REAPPROPRIATED FEDERAL
SUBTOTAL FUND FUND FUNDS FUNDS FUNDS
EXEMPT
$ $ $ $ $ $ $
Colorado State Forest
Service at Colorado State
University 114,384 114,384
Rural Teacher Recruitment,
Retention, and Professional
Development 1,209,357 1,209,357
(0.8 FTE)
Open Educational Resources
Initiatives 1,108,200 1,108,200
(1.0 FTE)
Forest Restoration and
Wildfire Risk Mitigation
Grant Program Cash Fund at
Colorado State University 8,000,000 8,000,000
Healthy Forests and Vibrant
Communities Fund at
Colorado State University 2,449,113 2,449,113
Financial Aid Assessment
Tool 154,069 154,069a
(0.5 FTE)
Growing Great Teachers -
Teacher Mentor Grants 548,477 548,477
(0.5 FTE)
SB23-005 CCHE Grants to
Expand Forestry Programs
PROGRAMS31a 766,418 766,418
1,803,568 1,803,568
PAGE 22-HOUSE BILL 26-1156

APPROPRIATION FROM
ITEM & TOTAL GENERAL GENERAL CASH REAPPROPRIATED FEDERAL
SUBTOTAL FUND FUND FUNDS FUNDS FUNDS
EXEMPT
$ $ $ $ $ $ $
Center for Substance Use
Disorder, Prevention,
Treatment, and Recovery
Support Strategies at the
University of Colorado
Health Sciences Center 4,250,000 4,250,000e
Online Platform for Public
Benefits for Higher
Education Students 45,000 45,000
Inclusive Higher Education
Grant Program 450,000 450,000
S.B. 22-192 Development
and Implementation of
Stackable Credentials 123,700 61,850 61,850f
(1.5 FTE)
34,552,475
35,589,625
a Of these amounts, $749,325 shall be from statewide indirect cost recoveries and $100,604 shall be from departmental indirect cost recoveries.
b This amount shall be from the Innovative Higher Education Research Fund created in Section 23-19.7-104 (1), C.R.S., from limited gaming revenue deposited to the Fund pursuant
to Section 44-30-701 (2)(a)(IV), C.R.S., in prior years.
c This amount shall be from student fees from non-resident students, including fees paid on behalf of non-resident students by the Western Interstate Commission on Higher Education,
pursuant to Section 23-31-118 (2), C.R.S. This amount is shown for informational purposes only because the student fees are paid directly to the Veterinary School at Colorado State
University.
d This amount shall be from the Severance Tax Operational Fund created in Section 39-29-109 (2)(b), C.R.S., pursuant to Section 39-29-109.3 (1)(b), C.R.S.
e These amounts shall be from the Marijuana Tax Cash Fund created in Section 39-28.8-501 (1), C.R.S.
f This amount shall be from the Credentials to Support Colorado Jobs Cash Fund created in Section 23-5-145.6 (5)(a), C.R.S.
TOTALS PART VII
(HIGHER EDUCATION) $6,310,738,197 $474,893,564 $1,188,577,036a $3,306,368,493b $1,313,891,684 $27,007,420c
$6,311,775,347 475,930,714
PAGE 23-HOUSE BILL 26-1156

APPROPRIATION FROM
ITEM & TOTAL GENERAL GENERAL CASH REAPPROPRIATED FEDERAL
SUBTOTAL FUND FUND FUNDS FUNDS FUNDS
EXEMPT
$ $ $ $ $ $ $
a This amount shall be from the General Fund Exempt Account created in Section 24-77-103.6 (2), C.R.S.
b Of this amount, $313,228,434 contains an (I) notation.
c This amount contains an (I) notation.
FOOTNOTES -- The following statements are referenced to the numbered footnotes throughout section 2.
31a DEPARTMENT OF HIGHER EDUCATION, COLORADO COMMISSION ON HIGHER EDUCATION AND HIGHER EDUCATION SPECIAL PURPOSE PROGRAMS, SPECIAL
PURPOSE, SB23-005 CCHE GRANTS TO EXPAND FORESTRY PROGRAMS -- THIS APPROPRIATION REMAINS AVAILABLE FOR EXPENDITURE UNTIL THE CLOSE OF
THE 2025-26 STATE FISCAL YEAR.
PAGE 24-HOUSE BILL 26-1156

SECTION 3. Safety clause. The general assembly finds,
determines, and declares that this act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety or for appropriations for
the support and maintenance of the departments of the state and state
institutions.
____________________________ ____________________________
Julie McCluskie James Rashad Coleman, Sr.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE PRESIDENT OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
____________________________ ____________________________
Vanessa Reilly Esther van Mourik
CHIEF CLERK OF THE HOUSE SECRETARY OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
APPROVED________________________________________
(Date and Time)
_________________________________________
Jared S. Polis
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF COLORADO
PAGE 25-HOUSE BILL 26-1156